Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7301
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-7301 to 77-7305 shall be known and may be cited as the School District Property Tax Relief Act.

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 9.